Hawaii statutes.
§660-30 Admitted to bail, when. If the
person is detained for any cause or offense and admittance to bail is a matter
of right, the person shall be admitted to bail, or bail may be dispensed with
as provided by the state constitution. If the person cannot furnish the bail
ordered, then the person shall be remanded with an order of the court,
expressing the sum in which the person is held to bail and the court at which
the person is required to appear. [L 1870, c 32, §22; RL 1925, §2753; RL 1935,
§4338; RL 1945, §10379; RL 1955, §239-30; HRS §660-30; am L 1972, c 90, §5(r);
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next